Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.097

Issuing, amending, or terminating a marketing order—Limitation on public hearings or referendums.

The director is not required to hold a public hearing or a referendum more than once in any twelve-month period on petitions to issue, amend, or terminate a marketing order if any of the following circumstances are present:

(1) The petition proposes to establish a marketing order for the same commodity;

(2) The petition proposes the same or a similar amendment to a marketing order; or

(3) The petition proposes to terminate the same marketing order.

[ 2002 c 313 s 49.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.